Mississippi, session 2026, SB2425.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  An entity of the state, and any unit or subdivision thereof, may enter into an intergovernmental support agreement with a branch of the armed forces of the United States under the National Defense Authorization Act (10 U.S.C. Section 2679) to provide installation-support services to a military installation located in this state. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force upon passage.